Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-1202
Contracts; licensed agent or attorney may execute.

Such contracts may be executed by an attorney, agent, or other representative, herein designated attorney, duly authorized and acting for such subscribers; Provided, that no such interinsurance contracts covering risks located or residing in this state shall be solicited, written, or placed, or caused to be solicited, written, or placed, except by or through a duly licensed agent of the attorney, resident within this state or licensed by the Department of Insurance; except that such contracts may be executed by the attorney, or an officer of the same if the attorney is a corporation, if done at the home office of the attorney or exchange in this state. The office or offices of such attorney may be maintained at such place or places as may be designated by the subscribers in the power of attorney.

Laws 1917, c. 189, § 2, p. 459;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. V, art. XV, § 2, p. 682;

C.S.1922, § 7970;

C.S.1929, § 44-1502;

R.S.1943, § 44-1202;

Laws 1949, c. 151, § 1, p. 388.